Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2112.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 5044YH (4) 91 sb/js H.F. 2112 Section 1. NEW SECTION . 481A.56B Retrieval of wounded deer 1 by use of a registered unmanned aerial vehicle. 2 1. A person having a valid hunting license and a valid 3 deer hunting license who has wounded a deer while hunting or a 4 person with a valid hunting license accompanying the person who 5 has wounded a deer while hunting may use a registered unmanned 6 aerial vehicle to track and retrieve the wounded deer. The 7 person who has wounded a deer may dispatch the deer using a 8 legal method of take authorized by the personâs deer hunting 9 license consistent with all rules and regulations for that 10 season. The person who has wounded a deer shall not use that 11 method of take to hunt, wound, or kill any animal other than 12 the deer that the hunter is tracking, except in self-defense. 13 Using a registered unmanned aerial vehicle on private property 14 is permissible at any hour with consent of the property owner. 15 2. All unmanned aerial vehicles must be registered with 16 the department of natural resources and the federal aviation 17 administration. The commission shall implement a registration 18 procedure for unmanned aerial vehicles to be used in wounded 19 deer recovery. The registration requirements must comply 20 with the federal aviation administration regulations. The 21 commission shall adopt rules pursuant to chapter 17A to 22 implement this section. 23 Sec. 2. Section 481A.125A, Code 2026, is amended by adding 24 the following new subsection: 25 NEW SUBSECTION . 5. This section does not apply to the use 26 of a registered unmanned aerial vehicles to retrieve a wounded 27 deer pursuant to section 481A.56B. 28 Sec. 3. Section 805.8B, subsection 3, paragraph q, Code 29 2026, is amended to read as follows: 30 q. For violations of section sections 481A.56A and 481A.56B , 31 the scheduled fine is two hundred fifty dollars. 32